Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 60 UNIFORM PARTNERSHIP LAW
7-60-138. Application of partnership property.

When dissolution is caused in any way, except in contravention of the partnership agreement, each partner as against the other partners and all persons claiming through them in respect of their interests in the partnership, unless otherwise agreed, may have the partnership property applied to discharge its liabilities and the surplus applied to pay in cash the net amount owing to the respective partners. But if dissolution is caused by expulsion of a partner, bona fide under the partnership agreement, and if the expelled partner is discharged from all partnership liabilities, either by payment or agreement under section 7-60-136 (2), the expelled partner shall receive in cash only the net amount due the expelled partner from the partnership.

When dissolution is caused in contravention of the partnership agreement, the rights of the partners shall be as follows:

Each partner who has not caused dissolution wrongfully shall have:

All the rights stated in subsection (1) of this section;

The right, as against each partner who has caused the dissolution wrongfully, to damages for breach of the agreement.

The partners who have not caused the dissolution wrongfully, if they all desire to continue the business in the same name either by themselves or jointly with others, may do so during the agreed term of the partnership and for that purpose may possess the partnership property, if they secure the payment by bond approved by the court or pay to any partner who has caused the dissolution wrongfully the value of such partner's interest in the partnership at the dissolution, less any damages recoverable under subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), and in like manner indemnify such partner against all present or future partnership liabilities.

A partner who has caused the dissolution wrongfully shall have:

If the business is not continued under the provisions of paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), all the rights of a partner under subsection (1) of this section, subject to paragraph (a)(II) of this subsection (2);

If the business is continued under paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), the right as against the other partners and all claiming through them, in respect of their interests in the partnership, to have the value of such partner's interest in the partnership, less any damages caused to the other partners by the dissolution, ascertained and paid to such partner in cash or the payment secured by bond approved by the court, and to be released from all existing liabilities of the partnership; except that, in ascertaining the value of such partner's interest, the value of the goodwill of the business shall not be considered.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 667, § 38.

CSA:

C. 123, § 38.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-38.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-38.

L. 2003:

(2)(a)(I) amended, p. 2236, § 114, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1), (2)(b), and (2)(c)(II) amended, p. 1429, § 93, effective July 1.

7-60-139. Rights dissolved for fraud.

Where a partnership contract is rescinded on the ground of fraud or misrepresentation of one of the parties, the party entitled to rescind is, without prejudice to any other right, entitled:

To a lien on or right of retention of the surplus of the partnership property after satisfying the partnership liabilities to third persons for any sum of money paid by such party for the purchase of an interest in the partnership and for any capital or advances contributed by such party; and

To stand, after all liabilities to third persons have been satisfied, in the place of the creditors of the partnership for any payments made by such party in respect of the partnership liabilities, subject to the limitations in section 7-60-115, if the partnership was a limited liability partnership at the time of its dissolution; and

To be indemnified by the person guilty of the fraud or making the representation against all debts and liabilities of the partnership.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 669, § 39.

CSA:

C. 123, § 39.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-39.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-39.

L. 95:

(1)(b) amended, p. 780, § 8, effective May 24.

L. 2004:

(1)(a) and (1)(b) amended, p. 1430, § 94, effective July 1.

7-60-140. Rules for distribution.

In settling accounts between the partners after dissolution, the following rules shall be observed, subject to any agreement to the contrary:

The assets of the partnership are:

The partnership property;

The contributions of the partners, as limited by paragraph (d) of this subsection (1), necessary for the payment of all the liabilities specified in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1).

The liabilities of the partnership shall rank in order of payment, as follows:

Those owing to creditors other than a partner;

Those owing to partners other than for capital and profits;

Those owing to partners in respect of capital;

Those owing to partners in respect of profits.

The assets shall be applied in the order of their declaration in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) to the satisfaction of the liabilities.

The partners shall contribute the amount necessary to satisfy the liabilities as provided by section 7-60-118 (1)(a) and as limited by said section and sections 7-60-115 and 7-60-134; but if any but not all of the partners are insolvent or, not being subject to process, refuse to contribute, the other partners shall contribute their share of the liabilities and, in the relative proportions in which they share the profits, the additional amount necessary to pay the liabilities.

An assignee for the benefit of creditors or any person appointed by the court shall have the right to enforce the contributions specified in paragraph (d) of this subsection (1).

Any partner or legal representative of a partner shall have the right to enforce the contributions specified in paragraph (d) of this subsection (1), to the extent of the amount that the partner has paid in excess of the partner's share of the liability.

The individual property of a deceased partner shall be liable for the contributions specified in paragraph (d) of this subsection (1).

When partnership property and the individual properties of the partners are in possession of a court for distribution, partnership creditors shall have priority on partnership property and separate creditors on individual property, saving the rights of lien or secured creditors as heretofore.

Where a partner has become bankrupt or the estate of a partner is insolvent, the claims against the partner's separate property shall rank in the following order:

Those owing to separate creditors;

Those owing to partnership creditors;

Those owing to partners by way of contributions.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 669, § 40.

CSA:

C. 123, § 40.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-40.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-40.

L. 95:

(1)(a) and (1)(d) amended, p. 781, § 9, effective May 24.

L. 2004:

(1)(f) and IP(1)(i) amended, p. 1430, § 95, effective July 1.

7-60-141. Liability of persons continuing business.

When any new partner is admitted into an existing partnership, or when any partner retires and assigns or the representative of the deceased partner assigns the deceased partner's right in partnership property to two or more of the partners or to one or more of the partners and one or more third persons, if the business is continued without liquidation of the partnership affairs, creditors of the first or dissolved partnership are also creditors of the partnership so continuing the business.

When all but one partner retire and assign or the representative of a deceased partner assigns the deceased partner's rights in the partnership property to the remaining partner who continues the business without liquidation of partnership affairs, either alone or with others, creditors of the dissolved partnership are also creditors of the person or partnership so continuing the business.

When any partner retires or dies and the business of the dissolved partnership is continued, as set forth in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, with the consent of the retired partner or the representative of the deceased partner but without any assignment of such partner's right in partnership property, rights of creditors of the dissolved partnership and of the creditors of the person or partnership continuing the business shall be as if such assignment had been made.

When all the partners or their representatives assign their rights in partnership property to one or more third persons who promise to pay the debts and who continue the business of the dissolved partnership, creditors of the dissolved partnership are also creditors of the person or partnership continuing the business.

When a partner wrongfully causes a dissolution and the remaining partners continue the business, under the provisions of section 7-60-138 (2)(b), either alone or with others and without liquidation of the partnership affairs, creditors of the dissolved partnership are also creditors of the person or partnership continuing the business.

When a partner is expelled and the remaining partners continue the business either alone or with others without liquidation of the partnership affairs, creditors of the dissolved partnership are also creditors of the person or partnership continuing the business.

The liability of a third person who becomes a partner in the partnership continuing the business under this section to the creditors of the dissolved partnership shall be satisfied out of partnership property only.

When the business of a partnership after dissolution is continued under any conditions set forth in this section, the creditors of the dissolved partnership, as against the separate creditors of the retiring or deceased partner or the representative of the deceased partner, have a prior right to any claim of the retired partner or the representative of the deceased partner against the person or partnership continuing the business on account of the retired or deceased partner's interest in the dissolved partnership or on account of any consideration promised for such interest or for the retired or deceased partner's right in partnership property.

Nothing in this section shall be held to modify any right of creditors to set aside any assignment on the ground of fraud.

The use by the person or partnership continuing the business of the partnership name or the name of a deceased partner as part thereof shall not of itself make the individual property of the deceased partner liable for any debts contracted by such person or partnership.

If the business of a limited liability partnership is continued after the death, retirement, or expulsion of a partner or the admission of a new partner, the partnership continuing the business is a limited liability partnership.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 671, § 41.

CSA:

C. 123, § 41.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-41.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-41.

L. 95:

(11) added, p. 781, § 10, effective May 24.

L. 2004:

(1), (2), (3), (8), and (11) amended, p. 1430, § 96, effective July 1.

7-60-142. Rights of retiring partner.

When any partner retires or dies and the business is continued under any of the conditions set forth in section 7-60-141 (1), (2), (3), (5), and (6), or in section 7-60-138 (2)(b), without any settlement of accounts as between the partner or the partner's estate and the person or partnership continuing the business, unless otherwise agreed, the partner or the partner's legal representative as against such persons or partnership may have the value of the partner's interest at the date of dissolution ascertained and shall receive as an ordinary creditor an amount equal to such value with interest, or, at the partner's option or at the option of the partner's legal representative in lieu of interest, the profits attributable to the use of the partner's right in the property of the dissolved partnership; except that the creditors of the dissolved partnership as against the separate creditors, or the representative of the retired or deceased partner, shall have priority on any claim arising under this section as provided by section 7-60-141 (8).

Source:

L. 31:

p. 674, § 42.

CSA:

C. 123, § 42.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-42.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-42.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1431, § 97, effective July 1.

7-60-143. Accrual of actions.

The right to an account of the partner's interest shall accrue to any partner or any partner's legal representative, as against the winding up partners, the surviving partners, or the person or partnership continuing the business at the date of dissolution, in the absence of any agreement to the contrary.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 675, § 43.

CSA:

C. 123, § 43.

CRS 53:

§ 104-1-43.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 104-1-43.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1431, § 98, effective July 1.

7-60-144. Registration of partnerships.

A partnership governed by this article may register as a limited liability partnership, and a limited partnership that has not made the election provided for in section

7-61-129

or

7-62-1104

may register as a limited liability limited partnership, by delivering to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, a statement of registration. If a certificate of limited partnership is being filed, the statement of registration may be included in the certificate of limited partnership. The statement of registration shall be approved in the manner provided in the partnership agreement or, if not so provided, shall be approved by all of the general partners. The statement of registration shall state:

The name that has been the true name of the partnership or limited partnership and the name that will be the domestic entity name of the partnership or limited partnership, which domestic entity name shall comply with part 6 of article 90 of this title;

The principal office address of its principal office; and

The registered agent name and registered agent address of its registered agent.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1432, § 99, effective July 1, 2004.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2003, p. 2236, § 115, effective July 1, 2004.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1432, § 99, effective July 1, 2004.)

Part 8 of article 90 of this title, providing for the transaction of business or the conduct of activities by foreign entities, applies to foreign limited liability partnerships and foreign limited liability limited partnerships.

(4.5) A limited liability partnership or a limited liability limited partnership may cease to be a limited liability partnership or a limited liability limited partnership by delivering to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, a statement of withdrawal of registration. The statement of withdrawal of registration shall be approved in the manner provided in the partnership agreement or, if not so provided, shall be approved by all of the general partners. The withdrawal of registration shall be effective upon the effective date of the statement of withdrawal of registration.

A partnership or a limited partnership that has been registered under this article is for all purposes the same entity that existed before it registered. A partnership or a limited partnership that withdraws its registration as a limited liability partnership or a limited liability limited partnership is for all purposes the same entity that existed before it withdrew its registration.

Unless the partnership agreement otherwise provides, registration of a partnership shall require the unanimous consent of the general partners in the partnership at the time the statement of registration is delivered to the secretary of state for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title. The filing of a statement of registration shall be conclusive as to third parties and shall be incontestable by third parties that all conditions precedent to registering as a limited liability partnership or limited liability limited partnership, as the case may be, have been met.

Except as to persons who were partners at the time of filing, the filing of a statement of registration shall be conclusive that all conditions precedent to registration under this section have been met.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 781, § 11, effective May 24.

L. 2000:

(1)(a) amended, p. 952, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

IP(1), (2)(b), and (3) amended, p. 1821, § 37, effective July 1; IP(1), (2)(b), and (3) amended, p. 1685, § 35, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1) to (4) and (6) amended, p. 2236, § 115, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1), (3), (5), and (6) amended and (4.5) and (7) added, p. 1432, § 99, effective July 1.

7-60-144.5. Statement of partnership authority or statement of denial.

With respect to a partnership governed by this article or a limited partnership that has not made the election provided for in section 7-61-129 (1)(a) or 7-62-1104 (2)(a), a statement of partnership authority may be delivered to the secretary of state pursuant to section 7-64-303, and a statement of denial may be delivered to the secretary of state pursuant to section 7-64-304, as if the partnership were governed by article 64 of this title or the limited partnership had made the election. Such statements have the effects specified in sections 7-64-303 and 7-64-304, respectively.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1433, § 100, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (HB 16-1333), ch. 241, p. 987, § 4, effective August 10.

7-60-145. Name of registered limited liability partnership. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 783, § 11, effective May 24.

L. 97:

IP(1), (1)(a), and (3) amended, p. 1498, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 990, § 109, effective July 1.

7-60-146. Limitations on distribution from limited liability partnerships.

A limited liability partnership or limited liability limited partnership shall not make a distribution to a general partner to the extent that, at the time of the distribution, after giving effect to the distribution, all liabilities of the limited liability partnership or limited liability limited partnership, other than liabilities to general partners on account of their partnership interests and liabilities for which the recourse of creditors is limited to specified property of the partnership, exceed the fair value of the assets of the partnership; except that the fair value of property that is subject to a liability for which the recourse of creditors is limited shall be included in the assets of the partnership only to the extent that the fair value of that property exceeds that liability. For purposes of this section and sections 7-62-607 and 7-62-608, the term "distribution" shall not include payments to the extent that the payments do not exceed amounts equal to or constituting reasonable compensation for present or past services or reasonable payments made in the ordinary course of business pursuant to a bona fide retirement plan or other benefits program.

A general partner in a limited liability partnership or limited liability limited partnership who receives a distribution in violation of subsection (1) of this section, and who knew at the time of the distribution that such distribution violated subsection (1) of this section, shall be liable to the partnership for the amount of the distribution. A general partner in a limited liability partnership or limited liability limited partnership who receives a distribution in violation of subsection (1) of this section, and who did not know at the time of the distribution that the distribution violated subsection (1) of this section, shall not be liable for the amount of the distribution. Subject to subsection (3) of this section, this subsection (2) shall not affect any obligation or liability of a general partner under an agreement or other applicable law for the amount of a distribution.

Unless otherwise agreed, a partner in a limited liability partnership or limited liability limited partnership who receives a distribution from the partnership shall have no liability under this article or other applicable law for the amount of the distribution after the expiration of three years after the date of the distribution unless an action to recover the distribution from such partner is commenced prior to the expiration of the said three-year period and an adjudication of liability against such partner is made in the said action.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 784, § 11, effective May 24.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1433, § 101, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 849, § 8, effective July 1.

7-60-147. Liability of partner in limited liability partnership upon return of contribution. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 784, § 11, effective May 24.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1433, § 102, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 884, § 87, effective July 1.

7-60-148. Law governing foreign limited liability partnerships - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 784, § 11, effective May 24.

L. 2003:

(2) added by revision, pp. 2356, 2357, §§ 347, 348.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)

7-60-149. Limited liability partnership periodic reports.

Part 5 of article 90 of this title, providing for periodic reports from reporting entities, applies to limited liability partnerships subject to this article.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 784, § 11, effective May 24.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 990, § 109, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section RC&RE, p. 2238, § 116, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1434, § 103, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1403), ch. 404, p. 1994, § 5, effective August 11.

7-60-150. Filing of report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 785, § 11, effective May 24.

L. 2003:

(2) added by revision, pp. 2356, 2357, §§ 347, 348.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)

7-60-151. Filing, service, and copying fees. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 785, § 11, effective May 24.

L. 98:

(2) amended, p. 1321, § 16, effective June 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 1861, § 163, effective July 1; entire section repealed, p. 1728, § 163, effective October 1.

7-60-152. Failure of limited liability partnerships to comply with part 5 of article 90 of this title. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 786, § 11, effective May 24.

L. 2000:

(3)(d) amended, p. 952, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2238, § 117, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

IP(1), (1)(a), and IP(4) amended, p. 1434, § 104, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 1218, § 26, effective October 1.

7-60-152.5. Registered agent - service of process.

Part 7 of article 90 of this title, providing for registered agents and service of process, shall apply to limited liability partnerships and limited liability limited partnerships and to foreign limited liability partnerships and foreign limited liability limited partnerships that are authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state pursuant to part 8 of article 90 of this title.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1434, § 105, effective July 1.

7-60-153. Application of corporation case law to set aside limited liability.

In any case in which a party seeks to hold the partners of a limited liability partnership or limited liability limited partnership personally responsible for the alleged improper actions of the limited liability partnership or limited liability limited partnership, the court shall apply the case law that interprets the conditions and circumstances under which the corporate veil of a corporation may be pierced under Colorado law.

For purposes of this section, the failure of a limited liability partnership or limited liability limited partnership to observe the formalities or requirements relating to the management of its business and affairs is not in itself a ground for imposing personal liability on the partners for liabilities of the limited liability partnership or limited liability limited partnership.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 787, § 11, effective May 24.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1434, § 106, effective July 1.

7-60-154. Scope of article - choice of law - application to professions and occupations.

A partnership, including a limited liability partnership or limited liability limited partnership, may conduct its business, carry on its operations, and exercise the powers granted by this article within and without the state.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the legal existence of limited liability partnerships and limited liability limited partnerships be recognized outside the boundaries of this state and that the law of this state governing the limited liability partnership or limited liability limited partnership transacting business outside this state be granted the protection of full faith and credit under section 1 of article IV of the constitution of the United States.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the internal affairs of a limited liability partnership or limited liability limited partnership formed in this state be subject to and governed by the law of this state, including the provisions governing liability of partners for debts, obligations, and liabilities chargeable to partnerships.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to permit a limited liability partnership to engage in a profession or occupation as described in title 12, C.R.S., for which there is a specific statutory provision applicable to the practice of such profession or occupation by a corporation or professional corporation in this state unless authorized under applicable provisions of title 12, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 787, § 11, effective May 24.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 2239, § 118, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1435, § 107, effective July 1.